Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ONETIME EXPANSION OF TARGETING PROPERTY TAX REFUND FOR PROPERTY TAXES PAYABLE IN 2026.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for refunds based on property taxes payable in 2026, the refund calculated under Minnesota Statutes, section 290A.04, subdivision 2h, must be calculated by substituting eight percent for 12 percent. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for refunds based on property taxes payable in 2026 only. new text end